Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2705
Health care crisis protocol; hospital; Department of Health and Human Services; duties.

(1) Each hospital shall have the health care crisis protocol available for inspection by the public.

(2) The Department of Health and Human Services shall publish a copy of the health care crisis protocol on the department's website for inspection by the public.

(3) For purposes of this section, hospital means a hospital licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act.

Laws 2021, LB139, § 9.

COVID-19 Liability Act, see section 25-3601.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.